Utah statutes.
49-11-801.   Defined contribution plans authorized -- Subject to federal and
state laws -- Rules to implement this provision -- Costs of administration --
Limitations on eligibility -- Protection of tax status.
(1) (a)  The board shall establish and administer defined contribution plans
established under the Internal Revenue Code.
(b)  Voluntary deferrals and nonelective contributions shall be permitted
according to the provisions of these plans as established by the board.
(c)  Except as provided in Subsections 49-22-302(2)(a), 49-22-401(3)(a),
49-23-302(2)(a), and 49-23-401(3)(a), the defined contribution account balance
is vested in the participant.
(2) (a)  Voluntary deferrals and nonelective contributions shall be posted to
the participant's account.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsections 49-22-303(3), 49-22-401(4),
49-23-302(3), and 49-23-401(4), participants may direct the investment of
their account in the investment options established by the board and in
accordance with federal and state law.
(3) (a)  The board may make rules and create plan documents to implement and
administer this section.
(b)  The board may adopt rules under which a participant may put money into a
defined contribution plan as permitted by federal law.
(c)  The office may reject any payments if the office determines the tax
status of the systems, plans, or programs would be jeopardized by allowing the
payment.
(d)  Costs of administration shall be paid as established by the board.
(4)  Voluntary deferrals and nonelective contributions may be invested
separately or in conjunction with the Utah State Retirement Investment Fund.
(5)  The board or office may take actions necessary to protect the tax
qualified status of the systems, plans, and programs under its control,
including the movement of individuals from defined contribution plans to
defined benefit systems or the creation of excess benefit plans authorized by
federal law.
(6)  The office may, at its sole discretion, correct errors made in the
administration of its defined contribution plans.
